finalproject.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N

LEXICON Root

Noun;
Verb;

LEXICON Noun

'fo.cu    Ninf;
a.'qu%:a Ninf;
'pac.tu    Ninf;
'ho%:.mi.ne Ninf;
spa.ta    Ninf;
for.'mi%:.ca Ninf;
ru.ssu  Ninf;
ves.ti%:.tu Ninf;
o.'ri.cu.la Ninf;
'lac.te Ninf;
'fo%:%.rno Ninf;
'fe%:%.mi%:%.na Ninf;
'le%.po%.re Ninf;
'te%.no%.ro%: Ninf;
'po%.de Ninf;
'po%.si%:%.to%: Ninf;
a.'pi.cu.la Ninf;
'sco.la Ninf;
'fa.bri.ca Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:^m   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;
